District of Columbia statutes.
21-2048

Termination of guardianship for incapacitated individual.

The authority and responsibility of a guardian of an incapacitated individual terminates upon the death of the guardian or ward, the determination of incapacity of the guardian, or the removal or resignation of the guardian as provided in section 21-2049 . The termination does not affect a guardian’s liability for prior acts or the obligation to account for funds and assets of the ward.

Feb. 28, 1987, D.C. Law 6-204, § 2(a), 34 DCR 632
1981 Ed., § 21-2048.
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 2-210 of the Uniform Guardianship and Protective Proceedings Act (1982 Act).